Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB698.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224.43-500 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Environmental remediation fee" means a two dollar ($2)[one dollar and
seventy-five cents ($1.75)] fee paid per ton of waste by generators of waste
and collected at transfer stations and waste disposal facilities that is in
addition to all other applicable fees and taxes assessed prior to January 1,
2003;
(b) "Transfer station" means a facility permitted by the cabinet where waste is
transferred from one (1) vehicle to another for transportation to a municipal
solid waste disposal facility;[ and]
(c) "Public road" means any city, county, state, federal, or limited access street,
highway, or turnpike, including bridges and bridge approaches; and
(d) "Residual waste facility" means a solid waste disposal facility designed and
operated to receive a limited number of nonhazardous industrial wastes for
disposal that are fully characterizable.
(2) The environmental remediation fee levied under this section is in addition to all
other applicable fees and taxes assessed prior to January 1, 2003. Notwithstanding
any law, franchise, or contract to the contrary, the owner or operator of a transfer
station or municipal solid waste disposal facility, or the person who collects waste
and delivers such waste to a transfer station or municipal solid waste disposal
facility may pass through and obtain from the generator any environmental
remediation fee required under this section.
(3) The environmental remediation fee shall be paid by generators of waste to be
disposed of at a municipal solid waste disposal facility and collected by waste
transfer stations or municipal solid waste disposal facilities in the Commonwealth.
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1192
No environmental remediation fee shall be collected at a municipal solid waste
disposal facility on waste for which the fee has been paid at a transfer station to the
disposal facility. The cabinet shall, by administrative regulation, adopt a conversion
formula to allow assessment of the fee by transfer stations that do not have scales.
For loads of waste weighing less than one (1) ton, the environmental remediation
fee shall be two dollars ($2)[one dollar and seventy-five cents ($1.75)].
(4) Not later than thirty (30) days following the last day of each calendar quarter, every
owner or operator of a transfer station or municipal solid waste disposal facility
shall remit to the cabinet the environmental remediation fee collected during the
prior quarter, with a report stating the number of tons of waste for which the
environmental remediation fee was collected.
(5) Moneys received by the cabinet for environmental remediation fees from residual
waste facilities shall be returned to the fiscal court of the county in which the
residual waste facility is located.
Section 2. KRS 224.43-505 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A trust fund known as the Kentucky pride fund is hereby established in the State
Treasury to receive money collected from environmental remediation fees
established in KRS 224.43-500, except that environmental remediation fees
collected from residual waste facilities shall be administered in accordance with
subsection (5) of Section 1 of this Act. The fund shall be used to accomplish the
purposes established in this section. Any money accruing to the fund in any fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. The fund
may also receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds. All interest
earned on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The cabinet shall administer the Kentucky pride fund as provided by this section
and any administrative regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. Except for
moneys received by the cabinet from residual waste facilities, which shall be
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1192
expended in accordance with subsection (5) of Section 1 of this Act, money from
the fund received by the cabinet shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) of the money deposited into the fund each
year shall be retained by the cabinet, subject to the following conditions:
1. The cabinet may use up to two and one-half million dollars ($2,500,000)
of the money deposited into the fund as necessary for direct costs
associated with site identification, characterization, and corrective action
assessments of solid waste disposal sites and facilities that have ceased
accepting waste before July 1, 1992, including former permitted
municipal solid waste disposal facilities or abandoned solid waste
disposal sites or facilities. The cabinet shall prioritize the sites and
facilities based on risks to human health, safety, and the environment,
and develop an implementation plan for closure and remediation of
those sites and facilities. Funds may be utilized to begin design and
implementation of proper closure and corrective action for those sites
and facilities with unabated pending violations.
2. The cabinet shall suspend until July, 2006, enforcement activity
regarding landfill closure and remediation obligations against formerly
permitted municipal solid waste disposal facilities owned by a city or
county that ceased accepting waste prior to July 1, 1992, except as
necessary to abate an environmental emergency.
3. Two and one-half million dollars ($2,500,000) per year shall be used to
pay debt service on bonds sold by the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority
in the amount of at least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), the
proceeds from which were deposited into the Kentucky pride fund
established in this section and utilized for undertaking closure and
corrective action at formerly permitted solid waste disposal facilities or
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1192
abandoned solid waste sites or facilities that ceased accepting waste
prior to July 1, 1992, which pose the most significant environmental or
human health risk. Moneys not appropriated for the identification and
characterization of orphaned or abandoned landfills, or debt service,
may be used for the elimination of illegal open dumps, direct costs
associated with the closure of orphaned landfills, recycling grants,
household hazardous waste grants, or additional debt service.
(b) The interest on all moneys deposited into the fund, including unused debt
services, shall be distributed annually in an amount not to exceed one million
dollars ($1,000,000) to the Kentucky Environmental Education Council for
implementation of the environmental education center component of the
Environmental Education Master Plan.
(c) The remaining balance of the funds from the environmental remediation fee
established in KRS 224.43-500, plus any unspent interest revenues, shall be
utilized by the cabinet for grants to counties for the elimination of illegal open
dumps and to establish a recycling and household hazardous waste grants
program. Any county, waste management district, city, urban-county
government, or other political subdivision of the state shall be eligible to
apply for recycling and household hazardous waste grants under this program.
(d) Two and one-half million dollars ($2,500,000) shall be transferred in each of
the fiscal years 2002-03 and 2003-04 and annually thereafter from the road
fund established in KRS 48.010(15)(g) and two and one-half million dollars
($2,500,000) shall be transferred in each of the fiscal years 2002-03 and 2003-
04 and annually thereafter from the highway construction contingency fund to
the Kentucky pride fund established in this section, to be reserved and
distributed annually for anti-litter control programs with distributions to be
made as follows:
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1192
1. Thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) of the money shall be
distributed annually based on each county's miles of public roads as a
percentage of the total miles of public roads in the Commonwealth at the
time of distribution;
2. Thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) of the money shall be
distributed annually based on the county's rural population as a
percentage of the total rural population of the Commonwealth at the
time of distribution. "Rural population" means the population residing
outside a city, town, or urban area with a population of two thousand
five hundred (2,500) persons or more;
3. Thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) of the money shall be
distributed annually based on the county's population as a percentage of
the total population of the Commonwealth at the time of distribution;
4. Of the moneys apportioned to counties on the basis of miles of public
roads and population as provided for in subparagraphs 1. and 3. of this
paragraph, the cabinet shall provide to the participating incorporated
cities within the jurisdiction of each respective county which, by
ordinance or other means, provides municipal solid waste collection
service, an amount of funds equal to the ratio of that city's total miles of
public roads in the county and the ratio of that city's population to the
population of the county, to be used for the purpose of litter cleanup on
public roads within city boundaries;
5. Moneys received by counties and cities pursuant to this paragraph shall
be applied for by November 1 of the year preceding the grant
distribution and shall be used to meet obligations with respect to the
litter cleanup of public roads required by the provisions of KRS 224.43-
345; and
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1192
6. Litter abatement funding rejected or otherwise returned from the grant
recipients shall be applied to the following year's allotment for litter
abatement grants.
(3) Any county may apply for a grant for the elimination of illegal open dumps subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The cabinet first shall prioritize expenditures from this fund among those
counties with approved solid waste management plans in order to address
those illegal open dumps posing the most significant public health and
environmental risks; and
(b) The cabinet shall provide grants to counties for eliminating illegal open
dumps. To be eligible for grant funding, the applicant shall:
1. Establish an effective universal municipal solid waste collection service
that is available to all county residences and businesses;
2. Employ a solid waste coordinator with enforcement powers;
3. Remain in compliance with an approved solid waste management plan
under this chapter;
4. Enter into agreement with the cabinet to provide a twenty-five percent
(25%) match which may be in kind to the grant amount and comply with
the grant criteria, except that the grant match may be waived for illegal
dump cleanups projected to cost more than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000);
5. Agree to use all legal methods at their disposal to collect delinquent
solid waste collection fees; and
6. Establish a committee to be designated as the clean county committee,
composed of representatives from business, schools, agriculture,
homemakers, and other concerned citizens, to increase awareness and
develop education and enforcement strategies to keep the county free of
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1192
litter and illegal open dumps.
(4) The cabinet shall impose the following requirements for recycling and household
hazardous waste management grants to counties, waste management districts, cities,
urban-county governments, or other political subdivisions of the state:
(a) Each grantee shall provide a twenty-five percent (25%) match to the grant
amount which may be in kind and shall comply with the grant criteria;
(b) Each grantee shall demonstrate that the proposed project will remain
financially viable after grant funds have been expended;
(c) The grantee shall demonstrate that the service added by the project is needed
and would otherwise be unavailable within the proposed service area; and
(d) Projects that create opportunities for regional recycling or regional household
hazardous waste management shall be given priority.
(5) Counties that meet the requirements set out above in subsection (3) of this section
shall be provided the following incentives and rewards by the cabinet:
(a) Extra points when applying for Land and Water Conservation Fund grants,
National Recreation Trails Funds grants, and funding from the state-funded
Community Rivers and Streams Program; and
(b) Priority consideration for funds from the Division of Conservation State Cost
Share Program for dumps on farmland and the Waste Tire Trust Fund for tire
dumps.
(6) The cabinet shall be reimbursed for reasonable costs related to the implementation
of the provisions of this section, not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000) annually.
(7) As used in this section, "residual waste facility" means a solid waste disposal
facility designed and operated to receive a limited number of nonhazardous
industrial wastes for disposal that are fully characterizable.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 10:31 AM Jacketed